California, session 20252026, AB591.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8615 of the Government Code is amended to read:8615. It is the purpose of the Legislature in enacting this article to facilitate the rendering of aid to areas stricken by an emergency emergency, including public works resources critical for disaster response and recovery, and to make unnecessary the execution of written agreements customarily entered into by public agencies exercising joint powers. Emergency plans duly adopted and approved as provided by the Governor shall be effective as satisfying the requirement for mutual aid operational plans provided in the Master Mutual Aid Agreement.SEC. 2. Section 8616 of the Government Code is amended to read:8616. During any state of war emergency or state of emergency when the need arises for outside aid in any county, city and county, or city, such aid that aid, including public works personnel, equipment, and materials, shall be rendered in accordance with approved emergency plans.It shall be the duty of public officials to cooperate to the fullest possible extent in carrying out such plans.SEC. 3. Section 8619.2 is added to the Government Code, to read:8619.2. The Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with relevant local and state public works agencies, shall develop and adopt a Public Works Emergency Mutual Aid Plan to ensure the systematic and efficient mobilization of public works resources during emergencies.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.